Nevada, session 83, AB432.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 242 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto the provisions set forth as sections 2 to 7, inclusive, of this
act.
Sec. 2. 1. The Security Operations Center shall develop
policies and procedures to:
(a) Combat the increasing threats to using agencies posed by
cybercriminals;
-
*AB432_R1*

– 4 –
(b) Protect sensitive data in the possession of a using agency;
and
(c) Ensure a coordinated and rapid response to any
cybersecurity incident that affects a using agency.
2. The policies and procedures developed pursuant to
subsection 1 must include, without limitation:
(a) A requirement that a using agency notify the Security
Operations Center of any specific or immediate threat to the
cybersecurity of an information system operated or maintained by
the using agency;
(b) A requirement that the Security Operations Center notify
the appropriate law enforcement agency and prosecuting attorney
and any other appropriate public or private entity of any specific
threat to the cybersecurity of an information system of which the
Security Operations Center has been notified;
(c) A strategy for developing ongoing programs for
professional development in cybersecurity for the employees of a
using agency; and
(d) The use of security orchestration automation and response
systems to automate repetitive tasks, enhance operational
efficiency and standardize procedures and responses for the
various information technology support of using agencies.
Sec. 3. If a using agency does not comply with the
cybersecurity policies and protocols developed by the Security
Operations Center, the Chief may impose additional oversight or
audit requirements on the using agency relating to cybersecurity.
Sec. 4. 1. The Account for the Security Operations Center
is hereby created in the State General Fund. The Chief must
administer the Account.
2. The money in the Account must only be used for the
purposes of supporting and carrying out the duties of the Security
Operations Center.
3. The Chief may apply for and accept federal grants for the
purposes of this section.
4. The Security Operations Center may serve as a fiscal agent
to pool federal grant funds for the purposes of cybersecurity
support and infrastructure development. The Security Operations
Center may establish criteria for using agencies to access shared
resources which must ensure equitable distribution of the
resources and maximize competiveness for federal opportunities.
5. All interest earned on the money in the Account, after
deducting any applicable charges, must be credited to the Account.
6. All claims against the Account must be paid as other
claims against the State are paid.
-
*AB432_R1*

– 5 –
7. Any money remaining in the Account at the end of a fiscal
year does not revert to the State General Fund and must be carried
forward to the next fiscal year.
Sec. 5. The Security Operations Center shall collaborate with
the Nevada Office of Cyber Defense Coordination created by NRS
480.920 to enhance communication and coordination of incident
responses to cyber threats or cyberattacks on information systems
and to provide each using agency information relating to
emerging cyber threats and best practices for cybersecurity.
Sec. 6. 1. On or before January 1 of each year, the Security
Operations Center shall prepare a report assessing the
effectiveness of the Security Operations Center relating to its
duties. The report must include, without limitation:
(a) A summary of the progress made by the Security
Operations Center during the previous year in performing its
duties and exercising such powers as are conferred upon it;
(b) A general description of any threats or attacks responded to
by the Security Operations Center during the previous year, and a
summary of the response to the threat;
(c) A summary of the goals and objectives of the Security
Operations Center for the upcoming year;
(d) A summary of any issues presenting challenges to the
Security Operations Center; and
(e) Any other information that the Chief determines is
appropriate to include in the report.
2. The report required pursuant to subsection 1 must be
submitted not later than July 1 of each year to the Governor,
Attorney General and Director of the Legislative Counsel Bureau
for transmission to the Legislature.
Sec. 6.5. Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to impair
or affect existing agreements with a federally recognized
American Indian tribe. Any interlocal agreement entered into with
the governing body of an Indian tribe, group of tribes, organized
segment of a tribe or any organization representing two or more
such entities must respect sovereign governance and provide for
jointly agreed data protocols.
Sec. 7. To the extent that funding is available:
1. The Security Operations Center shall, in collaboration with
the Nevada System of Higher Education, develop the
Cybersecurity Talent Pipeline Program. The Program must
develop a system for the career development of students in the
field of computer science or cybersecurity.
2. The Program must provide opportunities for students
within the Nevada System of Higher Education who are majoring
-
*AB432_R1*

– 6 –
in a field related to cybersecurity to obtain working experience in
the Security Operations Center.
Sec. 8. NRS 242.055 is hereby amended to read as follows:
242.055 “Information service” means any service relating to
the creation, maintenance, operation, security validation, testing,
continuous monitoring or use of an information system. The term
includes, without limitation, the real-time monitoring of
cyberinfrastructure, threat mitigation, incident response and
cybersecurity enforcement.
Sec. 9. NRS 242.061 is hereby amended to read as follows:
242.061 “Local governmental agency” means any [branch,] :
1. Branch, agency, bureau, board, commission, department or
division of a county, incorporated city or town in this State [.] ; or
2. The board of trustees of a school district.
Sec. 10. NRS 242.068 is hereby amended to read as follows:
242.068 “Using agency” means [an agency of the State which
has a function requiring the use of information technology,
information services or an information system.] :
1. A state agency or elected state officer who is required to
use the services and equipment of the Office pursuant to
subsection 1 of NRS 242.131.
2. Any other state agency or local governmental agency that
has negotiated with the Office for its services and equipment
pursuant to subsection 2 of NRS 242.131.
Sec. 11. NRS 242.071 is hereby amended to read as follows:
242.071 1. The Legislature hereby determines and declares
that the creation of the Office of the Chief Information Officer
within the Office of the Governor is necessary for the secure,
coordinated, orderly and economical processing of data and
information in State Government, to ensure the secure and
economical use of information systems and to prevent the
unnecessary proliferation of equipment and personnel among the
various state agencies.
2. The purposes of the Office are:
(a) To perform information services for [state] using agencies.
(b) To provide technical advice but not administrative control of
the information systems within the [state] using agencies . [and, as
authorized, of local governmental agencies.]
Sec. 12. NRS 242.080 is hereby amended to read as follows:
242.080 1. The Office of the Chief Information Officer is
hereby created within the Office of the Governor.
2. The Office consists of the Chief and:
(a) The Administration Unit. The Chief is the head of the
Administration Unit.
(b) The Client Services Unit.
-
*AB432_R1*

– 7 –
(c) The Computing Services Unit.
(d) The Network Services Unit.
(e) The Office of Information Security.
(f) The Security Operations Center.
(g) Other units, groups, divisions or departments deemed
necessary by the Chief to the extent such functions are supported by
the appropriations allocated to the functions of the Office.
3. A Network Transport Services Group and a
Telecommunications Group are hereby created within the Network
Services Unit of the Office.
Sec. 13. NRS 242.105 is hereby amended to read as follows:
242.105 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 3,
records and portions of records that are assembled, maintained,
overseen or prepared by the Office to mitigate, prevent or respond to
cybersecurity incidents or acts of terrorism, the public disclosure of
which would, in the determination of the Chief, create a substantial
likelihood of threatening the cybersecurity of a using agency or the
safety of the general public are confidential and not subject to
inspection by the general public to the extent that such records and
portions of records consist of or include:
(a) Information regarding the infrastructure and security of
information systems, including, without limitation:
(1) Access codes, passwords and programs used to ensure the
security of an information system;
(2) Access codes used to ensure the security of software
applications;
(3) Procedures and processes used to ensure the security of
an information system; and
(4) Plans used to re-establish security and service with
respect to an information system after security has been breached or
service has been interrupted.
(b) Assessments and plans that relate specifically and uniquely
to the vulnerability of an information system or to the measures
which will be taken to respond to such vulnerability, including,
without limitation, any compiled underlying data necessary to
prepare such assessments and plans.
(c) The results of tests of the security of an information system,
insofar as those results reveal specific vulnerabilities relative to the
information system.
2. The Chief shall maintain or cause to be maintained a list of
each record or portion of a record that the Chief has determined to
be confidential pursuant to subsection 1. The list described in this
subsection must be prepared and maintained so as to recognize the
existence of each such record or portion of a record without
revealing the contents thereof.
-
*AB432_R1*

– 8 –
3. At least once each biennium, the Chief shall review the list
described in subsection 2 and shall, with respect to each record or
portion of a record that the Chief has determined to be confidential
pursuant to subsection 1:
(a) Determine that the record or portion of a record remains
confidential in accordance with the criteria set forth in subsection 1;
(b) Determine that the record or portion of a record is no longer
confidential in accordance with the criteria set forth in subsection 1;
or
(c) If the Chief determines that the record or portion of a record
is obsolete, cause the record or portion of a record to be disposed of
in the manner described in NRS 239.073 to 239.125, inclusive.
4. On or before February 15 of each year, the Chief shall:
(a) Prepare a report setting forth a detailed description of each
record or portion of a record determined to be confidential pursuant
to this section, if any, accompanied by an explanation of why each
such record or portion of a record was determined to be confidential;
and
(b) Submit a copy of the report to the Director of the Legislative
Counsel Bureau for transmittal to:
(1) If the Legislature is in session, the standing committees
of the Legislature which have jurisdiction of the subject matter; or
(2) If the Legislature is not in session, the Legislative
Commission.
5. As used in this section, “act of terrorism” has the meaning
ascribed to it in NRS 239C.030.
Sec. 14. NRS 242.111 is hereby amended to read as follows:
242.111 The Chief shall adopt regulations necessary for the
administration of this chapter, including:
1. The policy for the information systems of [the Executive
Branch of Government, excluding the Nevada System of Higher
Education and the Nevada Criminal Justice Information System,]
using agencies, as that policy relates, but is not limited, to such
items as standards for systems and programming and criteria for
selection, location and use of information systems to meet the
requirements of [state] using agencies and officers [at] in the [least
cost to] best interests of the State [;] and using agencies;
2. The procedures of the Office in providing information
services, which may include provision for the performance, by [an]
using agency which uses the services or equipment of the Office, of
preliminary procedures, such as data recording and verification,
within the using agency;
3. The effective administration of the Office, including,
without limitation, security to prevent unauthorized access to
-
*AB432_R1*

– 9 –
information systems and plans for the recovery of systems and
applications after they have been disrupted;
4. The development of standards to ensure the security of the
information systems of the [Executive Branch of Government;]
using agencies; and
5. Specifications and standards for the employment of all
personnel of the Office.
Sec. 15. NRS 242.131 is hereby amended to read as follows:
242.131 1. The Office shall provide state agencies and
elected state officers with all their required design of information
systems. Additionally, the Security Operations Center shall
provide each state agency and elected state officer with
cybersecurity services, including, without limitation, real-time
monitoring of cyberinfrastructure, threat mitigation, incident
response and cybersecurity enforcement. All agencies and officers
must use those services and equipment, except as otherwise
provided in subsection 2.
2. The following agencies may negotiate with the Office for its
services , including, without limitation, cybersecurity services,
including, without limitation, real-time monitoring of
cyberinfrastructure, threat mitigation, incident response and
cybersecurity enforcement or the use of its equipment, subject to
the provisions of this chapter, and the Office shall provide those
services and the use of that equipment as may be mutually agreed:
(a) The Court Administrator;
(b) The Department of Motor Vehicles;
(c) The Department of Public Safety;
(d) The Department of Transportation;
(e) The Employment Security Division of the Department of
Employment, Training and Rehabilitation;
(f) The Department of Wildlife;
(g) The Housing Division of the Department of Business and
Industry;
(h) The Legislative Counsel Bureau;
(i) The State Controller;
(j) The Nevada Gaming Control Board and Nevada Gaming
Commission; [and]
(k) The Nevada System of Higher Education [.] ;
(l) Any local governmental agency.
3. Any state agency or elected state officer who uses the
services of the Office and desires to withdraw substantially from
that use must apply to the Chief for approval. The application must
set forth justification for the withdrawal. If the Chief denies the
application, the agency or officer must:
-
*AB432_R1*

– 10 –
(a) If the Legislature is in regular or special session, obtain the
approval of the Legislature by concurrent resolution.
(b) If the Legislature is not in regular or special session, obtain
the approval of the Interim Finance Committee. The Chief shall,
within 45 days after receipt of the application, forward the
application together with his or her recommendation for approval or
denial to the Interim Finance Committee. The Interim Finance
Committee has 45 days after the application and recommendation
are submitted to its Secretary within which to consider the
application. Any application which is not considered by the
Committee within the 45-day period shall be deemed approved.
4. Any local governmental agency which has entered into an
agreement to use the equipment and services of the Office and
desires to withdraw substantially from that use must apply to the
Chief for approval. The application must set forth the justification
for the withdrawal.
5. If the demand for services or use of equipment exceeds the
capability of the Office to provide them, the Office may contract
with other agencies or independent contractors to furnish the
required services or use of equipment and is responsible for the
administration of the contracts.
Sec. 16. NRS 242.151 is hereby amended to read as follows:
242.151 The Chief shall advise the using agencies regarding:
1. The policy for information services of the [Executive Branch
of Government,] Office as that policy relates, but is not limited, to
such items as standards for systems and programming and criteria
for the selection, location and use of information systems in order
that the requirements of [state agencies and officers] using agencies
may be met at the least cost ; [to the State;]
2. The procedures in performing information services; and
3. The effective administration and use of the computer
facility, including security to prevent unauthorized access to data,
information and plans for the recovery of systems and applications
after they have been disrupted.
Sec. 17. NRS 242.161 is hereby amended to read as follows:
242.161 1. All equipment of [an agency or elected state
officer] a using agency which is owned or leased by the State must
be under the managerial control of the Office, except the equipment
of the agencies and officers specified in subsection 2 of
NRS 242.131.
2. The Office may permit [an] a using agency which is
required to use such equipment to operate it on the using agency’s
premises.
3. The Security Operations Center shall not assume
operational control of the equipment or software systems of a
-
*AB432_R1*

– 11 –
using agency. Before providing services, the Security Operations
Center shall provide to the using agency standards and policies for
the equipment or software systems of the using agency which must
be agreed upon in writing.
Sec. 18. NRS 242.171 is hereby amended to read as follows:
242.171 1. The Office is responsible for:
(a) The applications of information systems;
(b) Designing and placing those information systems in
operation;
(c) Any application of an information system which it furnishes
to [state] using agencies [and officers] after negotiation; and
(d) The security validation, testing, including, without
limitation, penetration testing, and continuous monitoring of
information systems,
 for using agencies . [and for state agencies and officers which use
the equipment or services of the Office pursuant to subsection 2 of
NRS 242.131.]
2. The Chief shall review and approve or disapprove, pursuant
to standards for justifying cost, any application of an information
system having an estimated developmental cost of $50,000 or more.
No using agency may commence development work on any such
applications until approval and authorization have been obtained
from the Chief.
3. As used in this section, “penetration testing” means a
method of evaluating the security of an information system or
application of an information system by simulating unauthorized
access to the information system or application.
Sec. 19. NRS 242.181 is hereby amended to read as follows:
242.181 1. Any [state agency or elected state officer] using
agency which uses the equipment or services of the Office shall
adhere to the regulations, standards, practices, policies and
conventions of the Office.
2. Each [state] using agency [or elected state officer described
in subsection 1] shall report any suspected incident of:
(a) [Unauthorized access to an information system or application
of an information system of the Office used by the state agency or
elected state officer; and] A data breach;
(b) A distributed denial of service incident;
(c) A ransomware incident;
(d) Any other incident that disrupts the delivery or essential
services for more than 1 business day or directly affects life or
property; or
(e) Noncompliance with the regulations, standards, practices,
policies and conventions of the Office that is identified by the Office
as security-related,
-
*AB432_R1*

– 12 –
 to the Office of Information Security of the Office and Security
Operations Center within 24 hours after discovery of the suspected
incident. If the Office of Information Security , in consultation with
the Security Operations Center, determines that an incident of
unauthorized access or noncompliance occurred, it shall
immediately report the incident to the Chief. The Chief shall assist
in the investigation and resolution of any such incident.
3. The report submitted pursuant to subsection 2 must
contain the following information:
(a) The date and time of the incident;
(b) The type of incident;
(c) The type of information system or data affected by the
incident;
(d) The known and projected impact of the incident to the
using agency;
(e) Whether law enforcement, a regulatory body or any other
entity that could be affected by the incident has been notified, as
applicable; and
(f) Any additional resources needed by the using agency to
respond to the incident, as applicable.
4. The Chief may establish a uniform reporting system if the
Office and Security Operations Center are organizationally
collocated.
5. The Office shall provide services to each [state] using
agency [and elected state officer described in subsection 1]
uniformly with respect to degree of service, priority of service,
availability of service and cost of service.
Sec. 20. NRS 242.183 is hereby amended to read as follows:
242.183 1. The Chief of the Office of Information Security ,
in consultation with the Security Operations Center, shall
investigate and resolve any breach of an information system of a
[state] using agency [or elected officer that uses the equipment or
services of the Office of the Chief Information Officer] or an
application of such an information system or unauthorized
acquisition of computerized data that materially compromises the
security, confidentiality or integrity of such an information system.
2. The Chief Information Officer or Chief of the Office of
Information Security, at his or her discretion, may inform members
of the Technological Crime Advisory Board created by NRS
205A.040, the Nevada Commission on Homeland Security created
by NRS 239C.120 and the Information Technology Advisory Board
created by NRS 242.122 of any breach of an information system of
a [state] using agency [or elected officer] or application of such an
information system or unauthorized acquisition of computerized
-
*AB432_R1*

– 13 –
data or information that materially compromises the security,
confidentiality or integrity of such an information system.
Sec. 21. NRS 242.191 is hereby amended to read as follows:
242.191 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 3, the
amount receivable from a [state] using agency [or officer or local
governmental agency] which uses the services and equipment of the
Office must be determined by the Chief in each case and include:
(a) The annual expense, including depreciation, of operating and
maintaining the Network Services Unit [,] and the cybersecurity
services provided by the Security Operations Center, distributed
among the agencies in proportion to the services performed for each
agency.
(b) A service charge in an amount determined by distributing the
monthly installment for the construction costs of the computer
facility among the agencies in proportion to the services performed
for each agency.
2. The Chief shall prepare and submit monthly to the [state
agencies and officers and local governmental] using agencies for
which services of the Office have been performed an itemized
statement of the amount receivable from each [state] using agency .
[or officer or local governmental agency.]
3. The Chief may authorize, if in his or her judgment the
circumstances warrant, a fixed cost billing, including a factor for
depreciation, for services rendered to a [state] using agency . [or
officer or local governmental agency.]
Sec. 22. NRS 242.211 is hereby amended to read as follows:
242.211 1. The Fund for Information Services is hereby
created as an internal service fund. Money from the Fund must be
paid out on claims as other claims against the State are paid. The
claims must be made in accordance with budget allotments and are
subject to postaudit examination and approval.
2. All operating, maintenance, rental, repair and replacement
costs of equipment and all salaries of personnel assigned to the
Office must be paid from the Fund.
3. Each using agency using the services or equipment of the
Office shall pay a fee for that use to the Fund, which must be set by
the Chief in an amount sufficient to reimburse the Office for the
entire cost of providing those services, including overhead. Each
using agency shall budget for those services. All fees, proceeds from
the sale of equipment and any other money received by the Office
must be deposited with the State Treasurer for credit to the Fund.
Sec. 23. The provisions of NRS 218D.380 do not apply to any
provision of this act which adds or revises a requirement to submit a
report to the Legislature.
Sec. 24. NRS 242.141 is hereby repealed.
-
*AB432_R1*

– 14 –
TEXT OF REPEALED SECTION
242.141 Services provided for agencies not under
Governor’s control and local governmental agencies. To
facilitate the economical processing of data or information
throughout the State Government, the Office may provide service
for agencies not under the control of the Governor, upon the request
of any such agency. The Office may provide services, including,
without limitation, purchasing services, to a local governmental
agency upon request, if provision of such services will result in
reduced costs to the State for equipment and services.
H
-
*AB432_R1*